csv2fst/yaml_output/VTA_IND_aw.yaml
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagonaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagonaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoosiim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoom
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoo
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaasiwaanaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaanaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaasiwaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaasiwaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaanaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaanaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: nimikaagoosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: nimikaagoo
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: gimikaagoosiim
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: gimikaagoom
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: gimikaagoosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: gimikaagoo
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiiwag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: mikawaawag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiiwan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: mikawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: nimikaagoosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: nimikaagoomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: gimikaagoosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: gimikaagoomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagosiinaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimikaagonaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagosiinaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimikaagonaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiininaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagoninaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagosiinaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagonaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagosiiminaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagominaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagosiiminaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagominaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimikaagonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagosiinaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimikaagonaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimikaagonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiininaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagoninaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagosiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagominaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagosiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagominaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimikoosinooninimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimikooninimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimikoosinooninaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimikooninaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaasiibaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaasiibanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaasiiban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawisiimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimikawimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaawaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaawaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimikawisiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimikawiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimikawisiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimikawinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaasiibaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaasiibanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaasiiban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimikawisiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimikawiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiibaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimikaagobaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiibaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimikaagobaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaasiwaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagonaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagonaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagosiiwaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagowaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagosiibanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagobanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaagosiiban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimikaagoban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagosiiwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimikaagowaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaagosiiban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimikaagoban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaasiibanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoosiimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimikaagoomwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimikaagoonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaasiwaanaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaanaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaasiwaanaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimikawimaanaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaasiwaanaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaanaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaanaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaanaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaasiwaanaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimikawimaanaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaanaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaanaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: nimikaagoosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: nimikaagoonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: gimikaagoosiimwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: gimikaagoomwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: gimikaagoosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: gimikaagoonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiibaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: mikawaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiibanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiiban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: mikawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: nimikaagoosiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: nimikaagoominaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: gimikaagoosiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: gimikaagoominaaban
